Maryland, session 2026, HB1607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–306.2.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(4) “Community solar energy generating system” means a solar energy
system that:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1607*

HOUSE BILL 1607
(i) is connected to the electric distribution system serving the State;
(ii) is located in the same electric service territory as its subscribers;
(iii) is attached to the electric meter of a subscriber or is a separate
facility with its own electric meter;
(iv) credits its generated electricity, or the value of its generated
electricity, to the bills of the subscribers to that system through virtual net energy
metering;
(v) has at least two subscribers but no limit to the maximum number
of subscribers;
(vi) does not have subscriptions larger than 200 kilowatts
constituting more than 60% of its kilowatt–hour output;
(vii) has a generating capacity that does not exceed 5 megawatts as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(viii) may be owned by any person; and
(ix) with respect to community solar energy generating systems
constructed under the Program, serves at least 40% of its kilowatt–hour output to LMI
subscribers unless the solar energy system is wholly owned by the subscribers to the solar
energy system.
(7) “LMI subscriber” means a subscriber that:
(i) is low–income;
(ii) is moderate–income; or
(iii) resides in a census tract that is:
1. an overburdened community; and
2. an underserved community.
(d) (1) (i) The Commission shall establish and maintain a Community
Solar Energy Generating Systems Program.
(ii) The structure of the Program is as provided in this subsection.
(13) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a
community solar energy generating system may not be located on the same [or an adjacent]

HOUSE BILL 1607 3
parcel of land as an existing or proposed community solar energy generating system if the
total installed capacity of all community solar energy generating systems on the [same or
adjacent] parcel would exceed 5 megawatts.
(ii) The prohibition under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does
not apply to projects constructed:
1. on the rooftops of buildings;
2. in areas that are zoned for industrial use;
3. on brownfields locations and clean fill sites;
4. over parking lots or roadways;
5. on multilevel parking structures;
6. on or over transportation or public rights–of–way;
7. at airports;
8. on land that:
A. was previously zoned for industrial use or is ecologically
compromised; and
B. is not targeted for mitigation or restoration; or
9. in any location if the combined capacity of all community
solar energy generating systems on the same [or adjacent] parcel does not exceed 10
megawatts and:
A. at least 75% of the aggregate capacity of the co–located
community solar energy generating systems serves LMI subscribers;
B. for a site without a community solar energy generating
system installed before the start of the Program under paragraph (20) of this subsection,
all of the community solar energy generating systems installed after the start of the
Program are used for agrivoltaics; or
C. for a site with a community solar energy generating
system installed before the start of the Program under paragraph (20) of this subsection,
each new community solar energy generating system installed after the start of the
Program is used for agrivoltaics.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.